Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.06
Locating absent parents; determining income and employer; access to information; assistance; purpose.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law regarding confidentiality of records, every department and agency of state, county, and city government and every employer or other payor as defined in section 43-1709 shall assist and cooperate with the Department of Health and Human Services in locating absent parents, determining an absent parent's income and health insurance information, and identifying an absent parent's employer only for the purposes of establishing and collecting child, spousal, and medical support and of conducting reviews under sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.18. Such information shall be used for no other purpose. An action may be filed in district court to enforce this subsection.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding confidentiality of records, every public, private, or municipal utility shall, upon request, furnish to any county attorney, authorized attorney, or the Department of Health and Human Services a subscriber's name, social security number, and mailing and residence addresses only for the purposes of establishing and collecting child, spousal, and medical support and of conducting reviews under sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.18. Such information shall be used for no other purpose. An action may be filed in district court to enforce this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, utility shall mean any entity providing electrical, gas, water, telephone, garbage disposal, or waste disposal service, including, but not limited to, any district or corporation organized under Chapter 70.

Laws 1976, LB 926, § 8;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 70;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 53;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 160;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 62.